Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1015.
do enact as follows:AB1015,11Section 1. 49.155 (5) (ag) of the statutes is created to read:AB1015,2,4249.155 (5) (ag) Notwithstanding par. (a), an individual may not be determined 3to be liable for a copayment amount that exceeds 7 percent of the individual’s 4family’s gross income.AB1015,25Section 2. 49.155 (5) (ar) of the statutes is created to read:AB1015,2,8649.155 (5) (ar) Notwithstanding par. (a), an individual may not be determined 7to be liable for any copayment if the gross income of the individual’s family is below 8150 percent of the poverty line for a family the size of the individual’s family.AB1015,39Section 3. 49.175 (1) (p) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 1015, is amended to read:AB1015,2,171149.175 (1) (p) Direct child care services. For direct child care services under s. 1249.155 or 49.257, $376,700,400 in fiscal year 2021-22 and $383,900,400 in fiscal 13year 2022-23. In fiscal year 2023-24, for such direct child care services, 14$368,834,800. In fiscal year 2024-25, for such direct child care services, 15$428,779,700. In $531,926,700 in fiscal year 2025-26, for such direct child care 16services, $509,026,700. In and $548,926,700 in fiscal year 2026-27, for such direct 17child care services, $526,026,700.AB1015,418Section 4. 49.175 (1) (q) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 1915, is amended to read:AB1015,3,8149.175 (1) (q) Child care state administration and licensing activities. For 2state administration of child care programs under s. 49.155 and for child care 3licensing activities, $42,117,800 in fiscal year 2021-22 and $41,803,100 in fiscal 4year 2022-23. In fiscal year 2023-24, for such programs and activities, $45,796,000. 5In fiscal year 2024-25, for such programs and activities, $45,570,300. In 6$51,094,000 in fiscal year 2025-26, for such programs and activities, $51,064,000. 7In and $48,764,700 in fiscal year 2026-27, for such programs and activities, 8$48,734,700.AB1015,59Section 5. Fiscal changes.AB1015,3,1710(1) Child care subsidies. In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for the 11appropriation to the department of children and families under s. 20.437 (2) (md), 12the dollar amount for fiscal year 2025-26 is increased by $22,930,000 for the 13payments and administration of child care subsidies under s. 49.155. In the 14schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for the appropriation to the department of children and 15families under s. 20.437 (2) (md), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2026-27 is 16increased by $22,930,000 for the payments and administration of child care 17subsidies under s. 49.155.AB1015,3,1818